Utah statutes.
59-7-314.   Averaging property values for inclusion in property factors.
(1)  The average value of property shall be determined by averaging the values
at the beginning and ending of the tax period or averaging of monthly values
during the tax period if monthly averaging more clearly reflects the average
value of the taxpayer's property.
(2)  The average value of property of an airline is valued as provided in this
section, subject to the calculation required by Subsection 59-7-312(2).
